Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.230

Violations by signers—Initiative, referendum petitions—Penalty.

(1) Every person who signs an initiative or referendum petition with any other than his or her true name is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

(2) Every person who knowingly signs more than one petition for the same initiative or referendum measure or who signs an initiative or referendum petition knowing that he or she is not a legal voter or who makes a false statement as to his or her residence on any initiative or referendum petition, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2111; 2003 c 53 s 182; 1993 c 256 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.440. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 31; RRS s 5427. Formerly RCW 29.79.440, 29.79.450, 29.79.460, 29.79.470.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2003 c 53 s 182 and by 2003 c 111 s 2111, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 256: See notes following RCW 29A.84.280.

Misconduct in signing a petition: RCW 9.44.080.

Only registered voters may vote—Exception: RCW 29A.04.210.

Registration, information from voter as to qualifications: RCW 29A.08.210.

Residence

contingencies affecting: State Constitution Art. 6 s 4.

defined: RCW 29A.04.151.